Washington statutes.
RCW 18.55.010

Licensing—Exemptions—Limitations.

(1) Nothing in this chapter shall:

(a) Be construed to limit or restrict a duly licensed physician or employees working under the personal supervision of a duly licensed physician from the practices enumerated in this chapter;

(b) Be construed to prohibit an unlicensed person from performing mechanical work upon inert matter in an ocularist's office or laboratory;

(c) Be construed to authorize or permit a licensee under this chapter to hold himself or herself out as being able to, or to offer to, or to undertake to attempt, by any manner of means, to examine or exercise eyes, or diagnose, treat, correct, relieve, operate, or prescribe for disease or any visual deficiency.

(2) Each practitioner duly licensed pursuant to chapters 18.53, 18.57, and 18.71 RCW shall have all the rights and privileges which may accrue under this chapter to ocularists licensed under this chapter.

[ 1980 c 101 s 1.]